Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 656.990 is amended to read:
656.990. (1) Any person who knowingly makes any  false statement or representation to the
Workers’ Compensation Board or its employees, the Workers’ Compensation Board chairperson, the
Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services or employees  of the director, the
insurer or self-insured employer for the purpose of obtaining any  benefit or payment under this
chapter, either for self or any other person, [ or who knowingly  misrepresents to the board, the board
chairperson, the  director or the corporation or any of their representatives the amount of a payroll, or
who knowingly submits a false  payroll report to the board, the board chairperson, the director or the
corporation,] commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) An employer commits a  Class A misdemeanor if the employer, with the intent to de-
crease the employer’s premium for  coverage under this chapter, knowingly submits a false
payroll report to the Workers’  Compensation Board, the Workers’ Compensation Board
chairperson, the Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, the cor-
poration or an insurer.
[(2)] (3)  Violation of ORS 656.052  is a Class D violation. Each day during which an employer
engages in any subject occupation in violation of ORS 656.052 constitutes a separate offense.
[(3)] (4) Violation of ORS 656.056 is a Class D violation.
[(4)] (5) The individual refusing to keep  the payroll in accordance with ORS 656.726 or 656.758
when demanded by the director or corporation commits a Class C misdemeanor.
[(5)] (6)  Failure on the part of an employer to send the  signed payroll statement required by
ORS 656.504 within 30 days after receipt of notice  by the director or corporation is a Class A
misdemeanor.
[(6)] (7) Violation of ORS 656.560 (4) is a Class D violation.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to  ORS 656.990 by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply to em-
ployer conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1580 (SB 1580-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 19, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1580 (SB 1580-A) Page 2